Utah, session 2026, HB531.
Section 1. Section 26B-7-417 is enacted to read:26B-7-417. Scarification safety requirements.(1)A body art facility that practices or instructs scarification shall:(a)practice scarification procedures in a dedicated enclosed room that is not used for any other purpose;(b)obtain proof of age before performing a scarification procedure; and(c)provide a client, in writing, with:(i)instructions regarding proper care for the skin during the healing process after a scarification procedure, including warning signs of infection; and(ii)information about how to report an injury to the department.(2)The department shall establish rules to ensure that a body art facility that practices or instructs scarification has adequate policies and procedures in place for client safety, including rules that address:(a)clothing;(b)personal protective equipment;(c)use of single-use instruments;(d)sanitization and disposal of tools; and(e)cleaning and bandaging a client's skin.(3)The Office of Professional Licensure Review shall:(a)review the practice and instruction of scarification; and(b)report findings and recommendations to the Health and Human Services Interim Committee on or before November 1, 2026.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 63I-2-226 is amended to read:63I-2-226. Repeal dates: Titles 26 through 26B.(1)Section 26B-1-420, Cannabis Research Review Board, is repealed July 1, 2025.(2)Subsection 26B-1-421(9)(a), regarding a report to the Cannabis Research Review Board, is repealed July 1, 2025.(3)Section 26B-1-423, Rural Physician Loan Repayment Program Advisory Committee -- Membership -- Compensation -- Duties, is repealed July 1, 2026.(4)Section 26B-2-243, Data collection and reporting requirements concerning incidents of abuse, neglect, or exploitation, is repealed July 1, 2027.(5)Subsection 26B-3-215(5), regarding reporting on coverage for in vitro fertilization and genetic testing, is repealed July 1, 2030.(6)Subsection 26B-4-201(5), regarding the Cannabis Research Review Board, is repealed July 1, 2025.(7)Subsection 26B-4-212(1)(b), regarding the Cannabis Research Review Board, is repealed July 1, 2025.(8)Section 26B-4-702, Creation of Utah Health Care Workforce Financial Assistance Program, is repealed July 1, 2027.(9)Subsection 26B-4-703(3)(b), regarding per diem and expenses for the Rural Physician Loan Repayment Program Advisory Committee, is repealed July 1, 2026.(10)Subsection 26B-4-703(3)(c), regarding expenses for the Rural Physician Loan Repayment Program, is repealed July 1, 2026.(11)Subsection 26B-4-703(6)(b), regarding recommendations from the Rural Physician Loan Repayment Program Advisory Committee, is repealed July 1, 2026.(12)Section 26B-5-117, Early childhood mental health support grant program, is repealed January 2, 2025.(13)Section 26B-5-302.5, Study concerning civil commitment and the Utah State Hospital, is repealed July 1, 2025.(14)Section 26B-6-414, Respite care services, is repealed July 1, 2025.(15)Section 26B-7-120, Invisible condition alert program education and outreach, is repealed  July 1, 2025.(16)Subsection 26B-7-417(3), regarding a review of scarification by the Office of Professional Licensure Review, is repealed January 1, 2027.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 76-9-2001 is amended to read:76-9-2001. Definitions.As used in this part:(1)"Body piercing" means the creation of an opening in the body, excluding the ear, for the purpose of inserting jewelry or other decoration.(2)"Consent of a minor's parent or legal guardian" means the presence of a parent or legal guardian during the performance of tattooing or body piercing upon the minor after the parent or legal guardian has provided:(a)reasonable proof of personal identity and familial relationship; and(b)written permission signed by the parent or legal guardian authorizing the performance of tattooing or body piercing upon the minor.(3)"Minor" means a person younger than 18 years old who:(a)is not married; and(b)has not been declared emancipated by a court of law.(4)"Scarification" means the process in which a mark is cut into human skin tissue with the intent of leaving a permanent mark.(4)(5)"Tattoo" means to fix an indelible mark or figure upon the body by inserting a pigment under the skin or by producing scars.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 76-9-2004 is enacted to read:76-9-2004. Unlawful scarification of a minor.(1)Terms defined in Sections 76-1-101.5 and 76-9-2001 apply to this section.(2)Except as provided in Subsection (4), an actor commits unlawful scarification of a minor if the actor performs or offers to perform scarification:(a)upon a minor; and(b)for remuneration or in the course of a business or profession.(3)A violation of Subsection (2) is a class B misdemeanor with a mandatory fine of not less than $1,000.(4)An actor is not guilty of violating Subsection (2) if the actor:(a)has no actual knowledge of the minor's age; and(b)reviews, photocopies, and retains the photocopy of an apparently valid driver license or other government-issued picture identification for the minor that expressly purports that the minor is 18 years old or older before the actor performs the scarification.

Section 5:
Section 5.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.